Massachusetts, session 194th, S2558.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 6C of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 56 the following section:- 
Section 56A. (a) The department of state police, in consultation with the registrar of 
motor vehicles, the Massachusetts Chiefs of Police Association Incorporated and Advocates for 
Autism of Massachusetts or any other organization that advocates for persons with autism 
spectrum disorder, shall design blue envelopes that: 
(i) provide written information and guidance on the outside of the envelope regarding 
ways to enhance effective communication between a police officer and a person with autism 
spectrum disorder; 
(ii) include instructions for ease of access to the envelope, including, but not limited to, 
attaching the envelope to the sun visor on the driver’s side of the vehicle; and 

of 2 12  (iii) can hold a person’s motor vehicle operator’s license, registration and insurance 
identification card. 
(b) The registrar of motor vehicles shall make available, upon request, the blue envelopes 
to any person with autism spectrum disorder or such person’s parent or guardian.       
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.